Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.030

Amount and time of payment—Surviving spouse's benefit.

Supreme court, court of appeals, or superior court judges of the state who retire from office under the provisions of this chapter other than as provided in RCW 2.12.012 shall be entitled to receive monthly during the period of their natural life, out of the fund hereinafter created, an amount equal to one-half of the monthly salary they were receiving as a judge at the time of their retirement, or at the end of the term immediately prior to their retirement if their retirement is made after expiration of their term. The surviving spouse of any judge who shall have heretofore retired or may hereafter retire, or of a judge who was heretofore or may hereafter be eligible for retirement at the time of death, if the surviving spouse had been married to the judge for three years, if the surviving spouse had been married to the judge prior to retirement, shall be paid an amount equal to one-half of the retirement pay of the judge, as long as such surviving spouse remains unmarried. The retirement pay shall be paid monthly by the state treasurer on or before the tenth day of each month. The provisions of this section shall apply to the surviving spouse of any judge who dies while holding such office or dies after having retired under the provisions of this chapter and who at the time of death had served ten or more years in the aggregate as a judge of the supreme court, court of appeals, or superior court or any of such courts, or had served an aggregate of twelve years in the supreme court, court of appeals, or superior court if such pension rights are based upon RCW 2.12.012.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 1; 1971 c 30 s 5; 1961 c 286 s 3; 1957 c 243 s 1; 1951 c 79 s 1; 1945 c 19 s 1; 1937 c 229 s 3; RRS s 11054-3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 130.]

Construction—1971 c 30: See note following RCW 2.12.010.